Colorado, session 2026A, HB1256.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) The first 72 hours after release from incarceration are critical for
successful reintegration and public safety;
(b) The current amount, $100, of money provided to individuals
upon release from incarceration, known as gate money, has not been
increased since 1972 and has lost over 85% of its purchasing power;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(c) Colorado should ensure that every individual leaving custody has
access to basic resources including food, transportation, and temporary
shelter in order to reduce recidivism and promote stability;
(d) The department of corrections must maintain transparency and
accountability in the administration of all reentry-related funds;
(e) Access to government-issued identification is essential for
successful reentry, as it enables individuals to secure employment, housing,
health care, and benefits;
(f) Although Colorado has established an offender identification
program through prior legislation, eligibility restrictions prevent some
Coloradans from leaving department of corrections custody without valid
identification; and
(g) The state should ensure that all individuals leaving department
of corrections custody are able to verify their identity upon release.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 17-22.5-202, amend
(1); repeal (2); and add (6) as follows:
17-22.5-202. Release - clothes, money, transportation - reentry
services - reports.
(1) (a) Ten days prior to the date on which any inmate confined in
a correctional facility is entitled to be discharged or to be paroled from said
correctional facility, the executive director or the executive director's
designee shall give such inmate a ticket of leave therefrom, which shall
entitle the inmate to depart from said correctional facility.
(b) The executive director or the executive director's designee shall
at the same time furnish such inmate THE INDIVIDUAL RELEASED FROM A
CORRECTIONAL FACILITY with suitable clothing and may SHALL furnish
transportation, at the expense of the state, from the place at which said THE
correctional facility is located to the place of the inmate's INDIVIDUAL'S
residence in Colorado, or any other place in Colorado.
(c) (I) The executive director or the executive director's designee
shall also furnish to any inmate AN INDIVIDUAL being discharged, other than
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1256

a parolee, RELEASED FROM THE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY A RELEASE
ALLOWANCE OF one hundred dollars. The executive director or the executive
director's designee may furnish any inmate being released on parole a
reasonable sum of money not to exceed one hundred dollars; except that, if
the executive director or the executive director's designee furnishes less
than one hundred dollars, the difference between one hundred dollars and
the amount furnished shall be credited to an account for such parolee.
(II) THE RELEASE ALLOWANCE FURNISHED TO THE INDIVIDUAL BEING
RELEASED FROM THE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY MUST NOT BE SUBJECT TO
DEDUCTIONS FOR RESTITUTION, FEES, TRANSPORTATION, CLOTHING, OR ANY
OTHER EXPENSE INCURRED DURING THE INDIVIDUAL'S INCARCERATION OR
RELEASE FROM THE CORRECTIONAL FACILITY.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection (1), if the
inmate has previously been returned to custody in a correctional facility
after being paroled and before the completion of his or her period of parole
and previously received such sum of money, the executive director or the
executive director's designee shall not furnish a sum of money to the
inmate. The executive director or the executive director's designee shall
certify any amount so credited to the division of adult parole, and any such
amount shall be distributed to an inmate in accordance with rules
promulgated by the department.
(2) An inmate furnished with a ticket of leave for discharge shall be
deemed to be fully discharged from the sentence upon which he was
confined at the end of said ten-day period.
(6) BY SEPTEMBER 15, 2027, AND BY EACH SEPTEMBER 15
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PUBLISH ON ITS WEBSITE AND
PROVIDE TO THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES JUDICIARY COMMITTEE AND
THE SENATE JUDICIARY COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, A
REPORT THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING:
(a) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS RELEASED FROM DEPARTMENT
CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES IN THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR;
(b) THE NUMBER AND PERCENTAGE OF INDIVIDUALS WHO RECEIVED
THE RELEASE ALLOWANCE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION
IN THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR;
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1256

(c) THE TOTAL DOLLAR AMOUNT OF RELEASE ALLOWANCES
DISBURSED IN THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR; AND
(d) ANY ADMINISTRATIVE OR POLICY LIMITATIONS ON RELEASE
ALLOWANCE ELIGIBILITY OR DISBURSEMENT IN THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 17-33-102, amend
(2)(b), (2)(c), (2)(d), (3)(b), and (3)(c) introductory portion; and add (7) and
(8) as follows:
17-33-102. Colorado offender identification program - rules -
report - fee waiver - definitions.
(2) (b) (I) An offender may SHALL participate in the program if the
offender is eligible for, but does not have, a valid state-issued identification
card; EXCEPT THAT an offender may AFFIRMATIVELY elect not to participate
in the program. but the department shall not deny an eligible offender the
opportunity to participate in the program.
(II) IN ORDER TO OPT OUT OF PARTICIPATING IN THE PROGRAM, AN
OFFENDER MUST AFFIRMATIVELY NOTIFY THE DEPARTMENT THAT THEY
ELECT TO NOT PARTICIPATE IN THE PROGRAM. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASK
THE OFFENDER ONE HUNDRED AND EIGHTY DAYS BEFORE THE OFFENDER'S
RELEASE TO CONFIRM THE OFFENDER DOES NOT WANT TO PARTICIPATE IN
THE PROGRAM. IF THE OFFENDER AFFIRMATIVELY OPTS BACK INTO THE
PROGRAM, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL BEGIN THE PROCESS TO OBTAIN
IDENTIFICATION DOCUMENTS TO PREPARE FOR RELEASE.
(c) The department shall ensure that each offender released from a
correctional facility, on and after January 1, 2022 who is eligible for a
state-issued identification card and who participates in the program, has a
state-issued identification card upon release.
(d) The department shall collaborate with the department of revenue
AND THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT to operate the
program.
(3) The program must:
(b) At least once each year, review department records to determine
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1256

whether each offender scheduled for release within the next five years has
a valid, unexpired state-issued identification card, including at the offender
ID bank; and
(c) Assist an offender who elects to participate PARTICIPATES in the
program with obtaining a state-issued identification card. The assistance
may include, but is not limited to:
(7) BY SEPTEMBER 15, 2027, AND BY EACH SEPTEMBER 15
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE TO THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES JUDICIARY COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE JUDICIARY
COMMITTEE, OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, A REPORT THAT INCLUDES
THE FOLLOWING:
(a) THE NUMBER AND PERCENTAGE OF OFFENDERS RELEASED WITH
A VALID STATE-ISSUED IDENTIFICATION CARD, BIRTH CERTIFICATE, AND
SOCIAL SECURITY CARD IN THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR;
(b) THE NUMBER AND PERCENTAGE OF OFFENDERS WHO
PARTICIPATED IN THE PROGRAM AND ARE DEEMED INELIGIBLE FOR A
STATE-ISSUED IDENTIFICATION CARD, BIRTH CERTIFICATE, AND SOCIAL
SECURITY CARD, IN THE PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR AND THE REASON FOR
INELIGIBILITY; AND
(c) AN EXPLANATION OF BARRIERS AND CHALLENGES TO OBTAINING
IDENTIFICATION DOCUMENTS FOR OFFENDERS IN THE PRECEDING FISCAL
YEAR.
(8) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL NOT CHARGE A FEE TO AN OFFENDER
DURING THE PROCESS OF SECURING AN OFFENDER'S IDENTIFICATION
DOCUMENTS. ANY FEE INCURRED BY THE DEPARTMENT PAID IN ADVANCE TO
THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, OR THE DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
AND ENVIRONMENT DURING THE PROCESS OF SECURING AN OFFENDER'S
IDENTIFICATION DOCUMENT MAY ONLY BE CHARGED TO THE OFFENDER
AFTER THE OFFENDER HAS BEEN RELEASED FROM CUSTODY AND MAY BE
CONSOLIDATED WITH ANY EXISTING RESTITUTION, FEES, OR OTHER LEGAL
FINANCIAL OBLIGATIONS OWED BY THE OFFENDER. THIS INCLUDES ANY FEE
PAID BY THE DEPARTMENT TO THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE, OR THE
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND ENVIRONMENT TO THE FEDERAL
SOCIAL SECURITY ADMINISTRATION.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1256

SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 25-1.5-123 as
follows:
25-1.5-123. Colorado offender identification program.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLABORATE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF
CORRECTIONS TO OPERATE THE PROGRAM ESTABLISHED IN SECTION
17-33-102 TO PROVIDE STATE-ISSUED IDENTIFICATION FOR OFFENDERS.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect January 1, 2027; except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly, then the
act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people
at the general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will
take effect January 1, 2027, or on the date of the official declaration of the
vote thereon by the governor, whichever is later.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1256

(2) This act applies to all individuals released from custody on or
after the applicable effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1256